Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.430

Uniformed personnel—Legislative declaration.

The intent and purpose of chapter 131, Laws of 1973 is to recognize that there exists a public policy in the state of Washington against strikes by uniformed personnel as a means of settling their labor disputes; that the uninterrupted and dedicated service of these classes of employees is vital to the welfare and public safety of the state of Washington; that to promote such dedicated and uninterrupted public service there should exist an effective and adequate alternative means of settling disputes.

[ 1973 c 131 s 1.]

NOTES:

Construction—1973 c 131: See RCW 41.56.905.